District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-1949

Leave of absence for educational purposes — Compensation of other employees.

Repealed.

June 12, 1940, 54 Stat. 349, ch. 342, § 4
Aug. 21, 1964, 78 Stat. 584, Pub. L. 88-472, § 2
Mar. 12, 1976, D.C. Law 1-53, § 2, 22 DCR 5132
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-78, § 17, 29 DCR 49
1981 Ed., § 31-1014.
1973 Ed., § 31-635.